Utah statutes.
63C-14-301.   Commission duties.

(1)  Until November 30, 2014, the commission shall:

(a)  study and assess:

(i)  the financial stability of the federal government;

(ii)  the level of dependency that the state and local governments have on the receipt of federal funds;

(iii)  the risk that the state and local governments in the state will experience a reduction in the amount or value of federal funds they receive, in both the near and distant future;

(iv)  the likely and potential impact on the state and its citizens from a reduction in the amount or value of federal funds received by the state and by local governments in the state, in both the near and distant future; and

(v)  the likely and potential national impact from a reduction in the amount or value of federal funds paid to the states, in both the near and distant future; and

(b)  make recommendations to the governor and Legislature on methods to:

(i)  avoid or minimize the risk of a reduction in the amount or value of federal funds by the state and by local governments in the state;

(ii)  reduce the dependency of the state and of local governments in the state on federal funds; and

(iii)  prepare for and respond to a reduction in the amount or value of federal funds by the state and by local governments in the state.

(2)  After November 30, 2014, the commission shall study, assess, and provide recommendations on any federal issue that the governor, the Legislature through a joint resolution of the Legislature, or the Legislative Management Committee directs the commission to study, assess, and make recommendations on.

(3)  On or before November 30 of each year, the commission shall report to the Government Operations Interim Committee of the Legislature on the commission's findings and recommendations.



Enacted by Chapter 62, 2013 General Session

